en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Cooking & Baking Ingredients: Baking Chips; Baking Chocolate; Baking Flavors & Extracts; Baking Mixes; Baking Powder; Baking Soda; Batter & Coating Mixes; Bean Paste; Bread Crumbs; Canned & Dry Milk; Cookie Decorating Kits; Cooking Oils; Cooking Starch; Cooking Wine; Corn Syrup; Dough; Edible Baking Decorations; Egg Replacers; Floss Sugar; Flour; Food Acids & pH Regulators; Food Coloring; Frosting & Icing; Gums & Pectins; Lemon & Lime Juice; Marshmallow Creme; Marshmallows; Meal; Molasses; Pie & Pastry Fillings; Pie Crust Mixes; Shortening & Lard; Starter Cultures; Sugar & Sweeteners; Tapioca Pearls; Tomato Paste; Unflavored Gelatin; Vinegar; Waffle & Pancake Mixes; Yeast
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sestavine za kuhanje in peko: Čokoladne kapljice; Jedilna čokolada; Arome in izvlečki za peko; Mešanice za peko; Pecilni prašek; Soda bikarbona; Mešanice za testo in premaze; Fižolova pasta; Kruhove drobtine; Konzervirano mleko in mleko v suhi obliki; Kompleti za okrasitev piškotov; Jedilna olja; Jedilni škrob; Vino za kuhanje; koruzni sirup; Testo; Užitni okraski za peko; Jajčni nadomestki; Sladkor za sladkorno peno; Moka; Živilske kisline in regulatorji pH; Barvilo za živila; Glazura in obliv; Gumi in pektini; Limonin in limetin sok; Krema iz sladkornih penic; Penice; Mleto zrnje; Melasa; Nadevi za pite in peciva; Mešanice za testo za pite; Rastlinska maščoba in svinjska mast; Kvasne kulture; Sladkor in sladila; Tapiokine kroglice; Paradižnikova mezga; Želatina brez okusa; Kis; Mešanice za vaflje in palačinke; Kvas
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Кулинарные и кондитерские ингредиенты: Посыпки для выпечки; Кондитерский шоколад; Экстракты и ароматизаторы для выпечки; Смеси для выпечки; Разрыхлитель; Пищевая сода; Панировочные смеси; Бобовая паста; Панировочные сухари; Консервированное и сухое молоко; Наборы для украшения печенья; Пищевое масло; Пищевой крахмал; Кулинарное вино; Кукурузный сироп; Тесто; Съедобные украшения для выпечки; Заменители яиц; Сахар для сладкой ваты; Мука; Пищевые кислоты и регуляторы кислотности; Пищевые красители; Глазурь; Камеди и пектины; Лимонный и лаймовый сок; Маршмэллоу-крем; Маршмеллоу; Мука грубого помола; Меласса; Начинки для выпечки; Смеси для основы пирога; Кулинарный растительный и животный жир; Заквасочные культуры; Сахар и подсластители; Шарики тапиоки; Томатная паста; Желатин; Уксус; Смеси для вафель и панкейков; Дрожжи
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Ingredienser til madlavning og bagning: Diverse fyld til småkager; Usødet chokolade; Bageessenser; Kageblandinger; Bagepulver; Natron; Dejblandinger; Bønnepasta; Rasp; Dåsemælk og tørret mælk; Kagedekorationssæt; Madlavningsolie; Stivelse; Madlavningsvin; Majssirup; Dej; Spiselige kagedekorationer; Æggeerstatninger; Sukker til candy floss; Mel; Fødevaresyrer og pH-regulatorer; Frugtfarve; Glasur, frosting og icing; Geleringsmidler og pektin; Citron- og limejuice; Skumfiduscreme; Skumfiduser; Groft mel; Melasse; Tærtefyld; Tærtedejsblandinger; Klaret fedtstof; Starterkulturer; Sukker og sødemidler; Tapiokaperler; Tomatpuré; Gelatine; Eddike; Vaffel- og pandekageblandinger; Gær
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 요리 및 제과/제빵 재료: 베이킹 칩; 제빵용 초콜릿; 제빵용 향료/추출물; 제빵 믹스; 베이킹 파우더; 베이킹소다; 반죽/튀김 가루; 장류/팥소; 빵가루; 연유/분유; 쿠키 장식 세트; 식용유; 전분; 요리용 와인; 옥수수 시럽; 반죽; 식용 제과/제빵 장식; 에그 리플레이서; 솜사탕용 설탕; 가루류; 식용 산 및 pH 조절제; 식품 착색제; 프로스팅/아이싱; 검 및 펙틴; 레몬/라임 주스; 마시멜로 크림; 마시멜로; 으깬 곡물; 당밀; 파이/페이스트리 소; 파이 크러스트 믹스; 쇼트닝/라드; 종균 배양; 설탕/감미료; 타피오카 펄; 토마토 페이스트; 무향 젤라틴; 식초; 와플/팬케이크 믹스; 이스트
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Ingrediente pentru gătit și copt: Chipsuri pentru copt; Ciocolată pentru copt; Arome și extracte pentru copt; Amestecuri pentru copt; Praf de copt; Bicarbonat de sodiu; Amestecuri pentru aluat lichid și acoperire; Pastă de fasole; Pesmet; Lapte la conservă și lapte praf; Seturi pentru decorare fursecuri; Uleiuri pentru gătit; Amidon pentru gătit; Vin pentru gătit; Sirop de porumb; Aluat; Decorațiuni comestibile pentru copt; Înlocuitori de ouă; Zahăr pentru vată de zahăr; Făină; Acizi alimentari și regulatori de pH; Coloranți alimentari; Glazuri; Gume și pectine; Suc de lămâie și limetă; Cremă de bezea; Bezele moi; Făină integrală; Melasă; Umpluturi pentru plăcinte și produse de patiserie; Mixuri pentru aluat de plăcintă; Grăsime pentru frăgezirea aluatului și untură; Culturi starter; Zahăr și îndulcitori; Perle de tapioca; Pastă de roșii; Gelatina fără aromă; Oțet; Amestecuri pentru vafe și clătite americane; Drojdie
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivonta-aineet: Leivontahiput; Leivontasuklaa; Leivontamakuaineet ja -uutteet; Leivontasekoitukset; Leivinjauhe; Ruokasooda; Panerointi- ja leivitysseokset; Paputahna; Korppujauho; Säilykemaito ja maitojauhe; Keksien koristelupakkaukset; Ruokaöljyt; Tärkkelys; Ruuanlaittoviini; Maissisiirappi; Taikina; Syötävät leivontakoristeet; Kananmunan korvikkeet; Hattara; Jauho; Elintarvikehapot ja pH:n säätöaineet; Väriaineet; Kuorrutus; Kumit ja pektiinit; Lime- ja sitruunamehu; Vaahtokarkkikreemi; Vaahtokarkit; Jauhot; Melassit; Piirakka- ja leivostäytteet; Piirakkapohjasekoitukset; Leivonta- ja paistorasvat; Hapatteet; Sokeri ja makeutusaineet; Tapioca-helmet; Tomaattisose; Liivate; Etikka; Vohveli- ja pannukakkusekoitukset; Hiiva
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 烹饪与烘焙原料/作料: 烘培装饰原料; 烘培用巧克力; 烘焙调料/香精; 烘焙预拌粉; 发酵粉; 小苏打; 烤煎炸食物预拌调味粉/料/糊; 豆瓣酱; 面包糠/屑; 炼奶/淡奶/奶粉; 饼干装饰套件; 食用油; 烹饪淀粉; 料酒; 玉米糖浆; 面团; 可食用烘培装饰品; 素蛋粉; 棉花糖制作用糖; 面粉; 食用酸和 pH 调节剂; 食品着色剂; 点缀霜/糖霜; 食用胶和果胶; 柠檬/酸橙果汁; 液体棉花糖; 棉花软糖; 谷物粉; 糖蜜; 馅饼/糕点馅料; 派皮预拌粉; 酥油/猪油; 发酵剂; 糖和甜味剂; 珍珠粉圆/西米; 番茄膏; 无味明胶; 醋; 华夫饼/西式煎饼预拌粉; 酵母
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ingredience na vaření a pečení: Ozdoby na pečení; Čokoláda na vaření; Přísady a extrakty na pečení; Směsi na pečení; Prášek do pečiva; Jedlá soda; Směsi na těsto a polevy; Fazolová pasta; Strouhanka; Kondenzované a sušené mléko; Sady na zdobení pečiva; Kuchyňské oleje; Škrob na vaření; Víno na vaření; Kukuřičný sirup; Těsto; Jedlé dekorace na dorty; Náhrady vajec; Cukr na cukrovou vatu; Mouka; Potravinářské kyseliny a regulátory pH; Potravinářské barvivo; Polevy; Gumy a pektiny; Citronová a limetková šťáva; Marshmallow krém; Žužu a marshmallows; Moučka; Melasa; Náplně do pečiva; Směsi na křehké těsto; Tuk na pečení a sádlo; Startovací kultury; Cukr a sladidla; Tapiokové perly; Rajčatová pasta; Neochucená želatina; Ocet; Směsi na vafle a palačinky; Droždí
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Pişirme Malzemeleri: Kek Üzeri Parçacıklar; Kek Üzeri Çikolata Parçacıkları; Pişirme Ekstraktları; Un Karışımları; Kabartma Tozu; Karbonat; Pasta Hamuru ve Krema Karışımları; Fasulye Ezmesi; Ekmek Kırıntıları; Kutu Süt ve Süt Tozu; Kurabiye Süsleme Setleri; Yemeklik Yağ; Nişastalar; Yemeklik Şarap; Mısır Şurubu; Hamur; Yenilebilir Pasta Süsleri; Yumurta İkamesi; Pamuk Şeker Tozu; Un; Gıda asitleri ve pH düzenleyiciler; Gıda Boyası; Şekerli Krema; Gamlar ve pektinler; Limonata ve Misket Limonu Suyu; Marshmallow kreması; Marshmallow; Yemek; Şeker Pekmezi; Pasta Dolgusu; Turta tabanı karışımları; Katı Yağ ve Domuz Yağı; Starter Kültürler; Şeker ve Tatlandırıcılar; Tapyoka Topları; Domates Salçası; Aromasız Jelatin; Sirke; Waffle ve Gözleme Karışımları; Maya
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Koch- & Backzutaten: Raspeln, Flocken & Tröpfchen; Blockschokoloade; Backaromen; Backmischungen; Backpulver; Backsoda; Stärkemehl & Paniermischungen; Bohnenpasten & -saucen; Paniermehl; Dosen- und Trockenmilch; Backwaren-Deko-Sets; Speiseöle; Maisstärke; Kochwein; Maissirup; Teig; Essbare Backdekoration; Eiersatz; Zuckerwatte; Mehl; Lebensmittelsäuren & pH-Regulatoren; Lebensmittelfarben; Zuckerguss & Glasur; Geliermittel & Pektine; Zitronen- und Limettensaft; Marshmallow-Creme; Marshmallows; Gemahlene Getreideprodukte; Melasse; Kuchen- & Pastetenfüllungen; Kuchenboden-Mischungen; Backfett & Schmalz; Starterkulturen; Zucker & Süßstoffe; Tapiokaperlen; Tomatenmark; Geschmacksneutrale Gelatine; Essig; Backmischungen für Waffeln und Pfannkuchen; Hefe
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes de cocina y repostería: Pepitas para pastelería; Chocolate para repostería; Sabores y extractos para repostería; Mezclas para hornear; Levadura química; Bicarbonato de sodio; Mezclas para rebozar; Salsas y pastas de judías; Pan rallado; Leche enlatada o en polvo; Kits de decoración de galletas; Aceites para cocinar; Almidón de cocina; Vino para cocinar; Jarabe de maíz; Masa; Decoraciones comestibles para pastelería; Sustitutos de huevos; Azúcar para algodón dulce; Harina; Ácidos alimentarios y reguladores de pH; Colorante alimentario; Glaseado; Gomas y pectinas; Zumo de limón y lima; Crema de malvavisco; Nubes; Harina para cocina y repostería; Melazas; Rellenos para tartas; Mezclas para bases de pasteles; Grasa y manteca de cerdo; Levaduras; Azúcar y edulcorantes; Perlas de tapioca; Pasta de tomate; Gelatina sin sabor; Vinagre; Preparados para gofres y panqueques; Levadura
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Maisto gaminimo ir kepimo ingredientai: Konditerinio šokolado gabalėliai; Konditerinio šokoladas; Kepimo skoniai ir ekstraktai; Kepimo mišiniai; Kepimo milteliai; Kepimo soda; Plakiniai ir apvoliojimo mišiniai; Pupelių pasta; Džiūvėsėliai; Konservuotas pienas ir pieno milteliai; Sausainių dekoravimo rinkiniai; Kepimo aliejai; Kepimo krakmolas; Kulinarinis vynas; Kukurūzų sirupas; Tešla; Valgomosios kepinių dekoracijos; Kiaušinių pakaitalai; Cukraus vata; Miltai; Maisto rūgštys ir pH reguliatoriai; Maistiniai dažai; Glajai; Dervos ir pektinai; Citrinų ir laimų sultys; Zefyrų kremas; Zefyrai; Rupūs miltai; Melasa; Pyragų ir kepinių įdarai; Pyrago plutos mišiniai; Konditeriniai riebalai ir taukai; Bakterijų kultūros; Cukrus ir saldikliai; Tapijokos perlai; Pomidorų pasta; Želatina be skonio; Actas; Vaflių ir blynų mišiniai; Mielės
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Ingredienser för matlagning och bakning: Chokladflingor för bakning; Bakchoklad; Bakextrakt; Bakmix; Bakpulver; Natriumbikarbonat; Frityr- och paneringsmix; Bönpasta; Brödsmulor; Kondenserad mjölk och mjölkpulver; Kit för kakdekorationer; Matolja; Matlagningsstärkelse; Matlagningsvin; Glukossirap; Deg; Ätbara bakdekorationer; Äggersättning; Socker till sockervadd; Mjöl; Livsmedelssyror & surhetsreglerande medel; Karamellfärg; Glasyr; Växtgummi & pektin; Citron- och limejuice; Marshmallowkräm; Marshmallows; Krossade frön och sädeskorn; Melass; Pajfyllningar; Mixer för pajdeg; Matfett och ister; Syraväckare; Socker och sötningsmedel; Tapiokapärlor; Tomatpuré; Ej smaksatt gelatin; Vinäger; Våffel- och pannkaksmix; Jäst
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Съставки за готвене и печене: Шоколадов чипс за печене; Шоколад за печене; Аромати и екстракти за печене; Смеси за печене; Бакпулвер; Сода бикарбонат; Смеси за тесто и покритие; Паста от боб; Галета; Консервирано и сухо мляко; Комплекти за декориране на бисквитки; Масла за готвене; Нишесте за готвене; Вино за готвене; Царевичен сироп; Тесто; Ядливи декорации за печива; Заместители на яйца; Захарни конци; Брашно; Хранителни киселини и регулатори на pH; Хранителни оцветители; Глазура и айсинг; Гуми и пектини; Сок от лимон и лайм; Крем от маршмелоу; Маршмелоу; Пълнозърнесто брашно; Меласа; Пълнежи за пай и сладкиши; Смеси за кори за пай; Растителни и животински мазнини; Стартерни култури; Захар и подсладители; Перли от тапиока; Доматено пюре; Неовкусен желатин; Оцет; Смеси за гофрети и палачинки; Мая
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Ingredienti per cucinare e da forno: Pastiglie fondenti; Cioccolato amaro; Essenze e aromi da cucina; Preparati da forno; Lievito in polvere; Bicarbonato di sodio; Miscele per pastella e rivestimento; Paste e salse di fagioli; Pangrattato; Latte in scatola e condensato; Kit di decorazioni per dolci da forno; Oli da cucina; Amido di mais; Vino da cucina; Sciroppo di mais; Impasto; Decorazioni da forno commestibili; Sostituti per uova; Zucchero filato; Farina; Acidi alimentari e regolatori di pH; Coloranti alimentari; Glassatura e glassa; Gomme e pectine; Succo di limone e lime; Crema marshmallow; Marshmallow; Farina grossa; Melasse; Farciture per torte; Preparati per basi di crostate; Grasso alimentare e strutto; Fermenti; Zucchero e dolcificanti; Perle di tapioca; Pasta di pomodoro; Gelatina stabilizzante; Aceto; Preparati per cialde e pancake; Lievito
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 烹飪和烘焙食材: 烘焙用巧克力豆; 烘焙用巧克力; 烘焙香精/萃取物; 烘焙混合粉; 泡打粉; 食用級小蘇打粉; 麵衣預拌粉; 豆醬; 麵包粉; 罐裝牛奶和奶粉; 餅乾裝飾套組; 食用油; 食用澱粉; 料理酒; 玉米糖漿; 生麵團; 可食用烘焙裝飾; 代蛋粉; 棉花糖粉; 烘焙粉類; 食用酸與酸鹼調節劑; 食物染料; 糖霜; 食用膠與果膠; 檸檬汁/萊姆汁; 棉花糖霜; 棉花糖; 粗粉; 糖蜜; 派/糕點內餡; 派皮預拌粉; 起酥油和豬油; 發酵; 糖和甜味劑; 粉圓; 番茄糊; 無調味膠原蛋白粉; 醋; 鬆餅粉; 酵母
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Ingrédients pour la cuisine et la pâtisserie: Pépites; Chocolat à pâtisserie; Arômes et extraits alimentaires; Prémélanges de produits de boulangerie; Levure chimique; Bicarbonate de soude; Préparations pour pâtes et glaçages; Pâtes et sauces à base de haricots; Chapelure; Lait en poudre et lait concentré; Kits de décoration de gâteaux; Huiles de cuisson; Fécule; Vin de cuisine; Sirop de maïs; Pâte; Décorations comestibles pour pâtisseries; Substituts pour œufs; Sucre pour barbe à papa; Farine; Acides alimentaires et régulateurs de pH; Colorants alimentaires; Glaçage; Gommes et pectines; Jus de citron et de citron vert; Crème de guimauve; Marshmallows; Farine intégrale; Mélasse; Garnitures pour tartes et pâtisseries; Préparations pour pâte à tarte; Shortening et lard; Ferments; Sucre et édulcorants; Tapioca; Purée de tomates; Gélatine nature; Vinaigre; Préparations pour gaufres et crêpes; Levure
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Υλικά μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής: Κομμάτια σοκολάτας για ψήσιμο; Σοκολάτα για ζαχαροπλαστική; Αρώματα & εκχυλίσματα ζαχαροπλαστικής; Μείγματα ζαχαροπλαστικής; Μπέικιν πάουντερ; Μαγειρική σόδα; Μείγματα κουρκουτιού και πανέ; Πάστα φασολιών; Τριμμένη φρυγανιά; Εβαπορέ & σκόνη γάλακτος; Κιτ διακόσμησης μπισκότων; Μαγειρικά έλαια; Μαγειρικό άμυλο; Μαγειρικό κρασί; Σιρόπι καλαμποκιού; Ζύμη; Βρώσιμα διακοσμητικά ζαχαροπλαστικής; Υποκατάστατα αυγών; Ζάχαρη για μαλλί της γριάς; Αλεύρι; Οξέα τροφίμων και ρυθμιστές pH; Χρωστική ουσία τροφίμων; Κρέμες & γλάσα; Κόμμεα και πηκτίνες; Χυμός λεμονιού & λάιμ; Κρέμα marshmallow; Μαρσμέλοους; Γεύμα; Μελάσα; Γεμίσεις για τάρτες & ζύμες; Μείγματα για φύλλο πίτας; Λίπη ζαχαροπλαστικής & λαρδί; Καλλιέργειες μαγιάς; Ζάχαρη & γλυκαντικά; Μαργαριτάρια ταπιόκας; Τοματοπολτός; Ζελατίνη χωρίς γεύση; Ξύδι; Μείγματα για βάφλες & τηγανίτες; Μαγιά
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Nguyên liệu nấu ăn và nướng bánh: Vỏ bánh; Sô cô la làm bánh; Hương vị và chiết xuất làm bánh; Bột làm bánh trộn sẵn; Bột nở; Muối làm bánh; Bột nhão và hỗn hợp làm vỏ bánh; Sốt đậu; Bột chiên xù; Sữa đóng hộp và sữa khô; Bộ trang trí bánh quy; Dầu nấu ăn; Tinh bột dùng trong nấu ăn; Rượu nấu ăn; Siro bắp; Bột nhào; Đồ trang trí bánh ăn được; Sản phẩm thay thế trứng; Đường làm kẹo bông; Bột mì; Axit thực phẩm & chất điều chỉnh độ pH; Chất tạo mào thực phẩm; Lớp phủ hoặc tráng đông lạnh; Chất gôm & pectin; Nước chanh; Kem kẹo dẻo marshmallow; Kẹo dẻo xốp; Bột; Mật mía; Nhân bánh nướng và bánh ngọt; Bột trộn sẵn làm vỏ bánh pie; Mỡ trừu và mỡ lợn; Men cái; Đường và các chất tạo ngọt; Hạt trân châu; Sốt cà chua đậm đặc; Bột gelatin không mùi vị; Dấm; Hỗn hợp làm bánh waffle và pancake; Men bia
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Ingredientes para cozinhar e assar: Pepitas para cozinhar; Chocolate para cozinhar; Aromas e extratos para cozinhar; Misturas para cozinhar; Fermento em pó; Bicarbonato de sódio; Misturas para massas e revestimento; Pasta de feijão; Côdeas; Leite em lata e em pó; Kits de decoração de bolachas; Óleos de cozinha; Amido de cozinha; Vinho de cozinha; Xarope de milho; Massa; Decorações de cozinha comestíveis; Substitutos de ovos; Açúcar para algodão doce; Farinha; Ácidos alimentares e reguladores de pH; Corantes alimentares; Congelados e refrigerados; Gomas e pectinas; Sumo de limão e lima; Creme de marshmallow; Marshmallows; Farináceo; Melaços; Recheios de tarte e pastelaria; Misturas para massa de tarte; Reduções e banha; Culturas-mãe de fermentação; Açúcar e adoçantes; Pérolas de tapioca; Molho de tomate; Gelatina sem sabor; Vinagre; Misturas de waffle e panquecas; Fermento
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Főzési és sütési összetevők: Sütőchips; Sütőcsokoládé; Sütőízek és -kivonatok; Sütőkeverékek; Sütőpor; Szódabikarbóna; Tészta- és bevonókeverékek; Babpaszta; Kenyérmorzsa; Konzerv és száraz tej; Sütidíszítő készletek; Főzőolajok; Főzési keményítő; Főzőbor; Kukoricaszirup; Tészta; Ehető sütődíszek; Tojáspótlók; Vattacukor; Liszt; Étkezési savak és savanyúságot szabályozó anyagok; Élelmiszer-színező; Máz és cukormáz; Sűrítőanyagok és pektinek; Citrom- és lime-lé; Pillecukorkrém; Mályvacukrok; Étkezés; Melaszok; Pite- és péksütemény-töltelékek; Pitetészta-keverékek; Zsiradék és sertészsír; Indítókultúrák; Cukor és édesítőszerek; Tápiókagyöngyök; Paradicsompüré; Ízesítetlen zselatin; Ecet; Gofri- és palacsintakeverékek; Élesztő
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ส่วนผสมในการทำอาหารและการอบ: ชิปสำหรับการอบ; ช็อกโกเลตสำหรับการอบ; สารแต่งรสและสารสกัดสำหรับประกอบอาหาร; แป้งผสมสําหรับทําขนมอบ; ผงฟู; เบกกิ้งโซดา; แบทเทอร์และส่วนผสมเคลือบ; เนยถั่ว; ขนมปังชิ้นเล็กมาก; นมกระป๋องและนมผง; ชุดตกแต่งคุกกี้; น้ำมันทำอาหาร; แป้งประกอบอาหาร; ไวน์ที่ใช้ประกอบอาหาร; น้ำเชื่อมที่ทำจากข้าวโพด; แป้งผสม; สิ่งตกแต่งขนมอบที่กินได้; ผลิตภัณฑ์อาหารทดแทนไข่; น้ำตาลแบบเส้นใยไหม; แป้งทำอาหาร; กรดอาหารและสารควบคุมความเป็นกรดด่าง; สีผสมอาหาร; น้ำตาลไอซิ่ง; กัมและเพกทิน; น้ำมะนาว; มาร์ชแมลโลว์ครีม; มาร์ชเมลโล่; ธัญพืชบด; กากน้ำตาล; ไส้สำหรับพายและขนมอบ; ส่วนผสมแป้งพาย; เนยขาวและน้ำมันหมู; ต้นเชื้อจุลินทรีย์; น้ำตาลและสารให้ความหวาน; ไข่มุกแป้ง; ซอสมะเขือเทศเข้มข้น; เจละตินที่ยังไม่แต่งรส; น้ำส้มสายชู; ส่วนผสมสำหรับวาฟเฟิลและแพนเค้ก; ยีสต์
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Składniki do gotowania i pieczenia: Groszki czekoladowe; Czekolada do pieczenia; Aromaty i ekstrakty do pieczenia; Mieszanki do pieczenia; Proszek do pieczenia; Soda do pieczenia; Mieszanki na panierkę i polewę; Pasta fasolowa; Bułka tarta; Mleko w proszku i puszce; Zestawy z ciasteczkami do dekoracji; Oleje spożywcze; Skrobie; Wina do gotowania; Syropy kukurydziane; Surowe ciasta; Jadalne dekoracje do wypieków; Zamienniki jaj; Cukier do waty cukrowej; Mąki; Kwasy spożywcze i regulatory kwasowości; Barwniki spożywcze; Polewy i lukry; Gumy i pektyny; Sok z cytryny i limonki; Krem z pianek marshmallow; Pianki cukrowe; Kasze; Melasy; Nadzienia do ciast; Mieszanki na kruchy spód; Tłuszcz do pieczenia i smalec; Kultury starterowe; Cukier i słodziki; Granulaty tapioki; Pasta pomidorowa; Żelatyna; Octy; Mieszanki do robienia wafli i naleśników; Drożdże
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 調理材料・製菓材料: チョコチップ; 製菓用チョコレート; 製菓用エッセンス; ミックス粉; ベーキングパウダー; 重曹; 揚げ物用ミックス粉; 味噌類・調味料（豆原料）; パン粉; 缶ミルク、粉ミルク; クッキーデコレーションセット; 調理油; コーンスターチ; 料理酒; コーンシロップ; パン生地・製菓用生地; 製菓用デコレーション; エッグリプレーサー; 綿菓子用ザラメ; 小麦粉; 酸味料・pH調整剤; 食用色素; アイシング; 増粘剤・ペクチン; レモン果汁、ライム果汁; マシュマロクリーム; マシュマロ; 粗挽き粉; 糖蜜; パイフィリング; パイクラストミックス; ショートニング・ラード; スターター培養菌; 砂糖・甘味料; タピオカパール; トマトペースト; 無香料ゼラチン; 酢; ホットケーキミックス; イースト
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Sastojci za kuhanje i pečenje kolača: Pečeni čokoladni keksi; Čokolada za kuhanje; Arome i ekstrakti za kolače; Mješavine za pečenje kolača; Prašak za pecivo; Soda bikarbona; Mješavine za tijesto i premazivanje; Paste od graha; Krušne mrvice; Konzervirano i mlijeko u prahu; Setovi za ukrašavanje kolačića; Ulja za kuhanje; Škrob za kuhanje; Vino za kuhanje; Kukuruzni sirup; Tijesto; Jestivi ukrasi za pečenje; Zamjene za jaja; Šećerna vuna; Brašno; Kiseline za hranu i regulatori pH vrijednosti; Prehrambene boje; Glazura; Gume i pektini; Sok od limuna i limete; Krema od bijelog sljeza; Sljezovi kolačići; Jelo; Melasa; Nadjev za pite i peciva; Mješavine za kore za pite; Maslo i mast; Starter kulture; Šećer i zaslađivači; Biseri tapioke; Pasta od rajčice; Želatina bez okusa; Ocat; Mješavine za vafle i palačinke; Kvasac
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Ingrediënten voor koken en bakken: Eetbare taartdecoraties; Kookchocolade; Bakaroma's en -extracten; Bakmixen; Bakpoeder; Baksoda; Beslag- en glazuurmixen; Bonenpasta's en -sauzen; Broodkruimels; Blikmelk en melkpoeder; Sets met koekdecoraties; Olie voor kookdoeleinden; Zetmeel voor kookdoeleinden; Kookwijn; Glucosestroop; Deeg; Eetbare bakdecoraties; Eiervervanger; Gesponnen suiker; Bloem; Voedingszuren en zuurteregelaars; Voedselkleurstoffen; Glazuur; Gommen en pectines; Citroen- en limoensap; Marshmallowcrème; Marshmallows; Meel; Melasse; Taart- en gebakvullingen; Taartbodemmixen; Bakvet en reuzel; Startculturen; Suiker en zoetstoffen; Tapiocaparels; Tomatenpuree; Naturel gelatine; Azijn; Mixen voor wafels en pannenkoeken; Gist
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Ingredienser til matlagning og baking: Bakenibs; Bakesjokolade; Bakesmaker og -ekstrakter; Bakemikser; Bakepulver; Natron; Røremikser; Bønnepaste; Brødsmuler; Tørrmelk og melk på boks; Sett for kakedekorasjon; Oljer til matlagning; Stivelse til matlagning; Vin til matlagning; Maissirup; Deig; Spiselige bakedekorasjoner; Eggerstatninger; candyfloss-sukker; Mel; Matsyrer og pH-regulatorer; Konditorfarge; Glasur; Gummi og pektin; Sitron- og limejuice; Marshmallowkrem; Marshmallows; Måltid; Melasse; Pai- og bakerfyll; Paibunnmikser; Matfett og smult; Startkulturer; Sukker og søtstoffer; Tapiokakuler; Tomatpuré; Ikke smakssatt gelatin; Eddik; Vaffel- og pannekakemikser; Gjær
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Prísady na varenie a pečenie: Čipsy na pečenie; Čokoláda na pečenie; Príchute a extrakty na pečenie; Zmesi na pečenie; Prášok do pečiva; Jedlá sóda; Zmesi na cestíčko a obaľovanie; Fazuľová pasta; Strúhanka; Konzervované a sušené mlieko; Súpravy na zdobenie koláčikov; Oleje na varenie; Škrob na varenie; Víno na varenie; Kukuričný sirup; Cesto; Jedlé ozdoby na pečenie; Náhrada vajec; Zmes na cukrovú vatu; Múka; Potravinárske kyseliny a regulátory pH; Potravinárske farbivá; Cukrová poleva; Želírujúce látky; Citrónová a limetová šťava; Marshmallow krém; Marshmallow; Jedlo; Melasa; Plnky do koláčov a pečiva; Zmesi na cesto na koláče; Tuk a bravčová masť; Štartovacie kultúry; Cukor a sladidlá; Tapiokové perly; Paradajkový pretlak; Neochutená želatína; Ocot; Zmesi na vafle a palacinky; Kvasnice
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes para cozidos e assados: Chips para assados; Chocolate amargo; Aromatizantes e extratos para confeitaria; Misturas para bolo; Fermento em pó químico; Bicarbonato de sódio; Misturas para massa e cobertura; Pastas e molhos de feijão; Crocantes de pão; Leite condensado e em pó; Kits de decoração de biscoitos; Óleos de cozinha; Amido ou fécula; Vinho para culinária; Xarope de milho; Massas; Decorações de bolo comestíveis; Substitutos do ovo; Açúcar para algodão doce; Farinha; Ácidos alimentares e reguladores de acidez; Corantes alimentares; Coberturas e glacê; Gomas e pectinas; Suco de limão; Creme de marshmallow; Marshmallows; Farinha de trigo integral; Melaço; Recheios para tortas; Misturas para massa de torta; Gordura vegetal e animal; Culturas de fermentação; Açúcar e adoçantes; Pérolas de tapioca; Pasta de tomate; Gelatina sem sabor; Vinagre; Misturas para waffles e panquecas; Fermento